test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IN_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
     kyáambda ín+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: kyáambda ín
     kyáambda ín+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín.ga
     kyáambda ín+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín
     kyáambda ín+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín.gang
     kyáambda ín+V+DIRECT+PAST: kyáambda ín.gan
     kyáambda ín+V+RELATIVE: kyáambda íns
     kyáambda ín+V+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ínang
     kyáambda ín+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín.gang
     kyáambda ín+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín.ganggang
     kyáambda ín+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín.gangang
     kyáambda ín+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín.giinii
     kyáambda ín+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín.gaangaa
     kyáambda ín+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín.gaangaan
     kyáambda ín+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kyáambda ínäsaa
     kyáambda ín+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kyáambda ínäs
     kyáambda ín+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kyáambda ínäsaang
     kyáambda ín+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kyáambda ínäsga
     kyáambda ín+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kyáambda ínäsaas
     kyáambda ín+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ínäsaa.ang
     kyáambda ín+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ínang k̲asa'áa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ínang k̲asa'áang
     kyáambda ín+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ínang k̲asaasdláa
     kyáambda ín+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ínang k̲asaasdláang
     kyáambda ín+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'uuj
     kyáambda ín+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'uujang
     kyáambda ín+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kyáambda ínäsaa'uujang
     kyáambda ín+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'us
     kyáambda ín+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kyáambda ín'ujaa
     kyáambda ín+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'uujaangaa
     kyáambda ín+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kyáambda ínäsaa'us
     kyáambda ín+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kyáambda ínäsaa'ahlans
     kyáambda ín+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kyáambda ínäseehl
     kyáambda ín+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: kyáambda ín'uu
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'waa
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'waa
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'waang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: kyáambda ín'wägan
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kyáambda ín'aawaa
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: kyáambda ín'aawaan
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: kyáambda ín'waas
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kyáambda ín'aawaas
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín'waa.ang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín'aawaa.ang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín.gang'waa
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín.gang'waang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín.gang'waa.ang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'wägiinii
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'wägaangaa
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'wägaangaan
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kyáambda ín'waaäsaa
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kyáambda ín'waaäs
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waaäsaang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waaäsga
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waaäsaas
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín'waaäsaa.ang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'waa'uuj
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'waa'uujang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kyáambda ín'waaäsaa'uujang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'waa'us
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kyáambda ín'waa'ujaa
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'waa'uujaangaa
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waaäsaa'us
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'waa'ahlanggang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: kyáambda ín'waa'ahlanggan
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'waa'ahlanggiinii
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waaäsaa'ahlans
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kyáambda ín'waa'ahlans
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: kyáambda ín'aawaa'ahlang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kyáambda ín'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'aawaa'ahlanggang
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: kyáambda ín'waa'ahl
     kyáambda ín+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kyáambda ín'waaäseehl
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: kyáambda ín'ang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'angga
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'anggang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: kyáambda ín'anggan
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kyáambda ín'aangaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: kyáambda ín'aangaan
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: kyáambda ín'ans
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kyáambda ín'aangaas
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín'angang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín'aangaa.ang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'anggang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín.gang'anggang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín.gang'angang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'anggiinii
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'anggaangaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'anggaangaan
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kyáambda ín'angäsaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kyáambda ín'angäs
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'angäsaang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'angäsga
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'angäsaas
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín'angäsaa.ang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ínang k̲asaa'áng
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ínang k̲asaa'ánggang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ínang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ínang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang'uuj
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang'uujang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kyáambda ín'angäsaa'uujang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang'us
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kyáambda ín'ang'ujaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'ang'uujaangaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'angäsaa'us
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'aang'ahlanggang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: kyáambda ín'aang'ahlanggan
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'aang'ahlanggiinii
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'angäsaa'ahlans
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kyáambda ín'aang'ahlans
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: kyáambda ín'aangaa'ahlang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kyáambda ín'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'aangaa'ahlanggang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: kyáambda ín'aang'ahl
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kyáambda ín'angäseehl
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: kyáambda ín'ang'uu
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang'waa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang'waa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang'waang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: kyáambda ín'ang'wägan
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kyáambda ín'ang'aawaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: kyáambda ín'ang'aawaan
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: kyáambda ín'ang'waas
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kyáambda ín'ang'aawaas
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín'ang'waa.ang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín'ang'aawaa.ang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín.gang'ang'waa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín.gang'ang'waang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín.gang'ang'waa.ang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'ang'wägiinii
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'ang'wägaangaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'ang'wägaangaan
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kyáambda ín'ang'waaäsaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kyáambda ín'ang'waaäs
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'ang'waaäsaang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'ang'waaäsga
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'ang'waaäsaas
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kyáambda ín'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang'waa'uuj
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang'waa'uujang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kyáambda ín'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang'waa'us
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kyáambda ín'ang'waa'ujaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kyáambda ín'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kyáambda ín'ang'waaäsaa'us
     kyáambda ín+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kyáambda ín'ang'waa'ahlanggang
